Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.646

Coordinating the purchase and delivery of biodiesel—Reports.

(1) The department must assist state agencies seeking to meet the biodiesel fuel requirements in RCW 43.19.642 by coordinating the purchase and delivery of biodiesel if requested by any state agency. The department may use long-term contracts of up to ten years, when purchasing from in-state suppliers who use predominantly in-state feedstock, to secure a sufficient and stable supply of biodiesel for use by state agencies.

(2) The department shall compile and analyze the reports submitted under RCW 43.19.642(3) and report in an electronic format its findings and recommendations to the governor and committees of the legislature with responsibility for energy issues, within sixty days from the end of each reporting period. The governor shall consider these reports in determining whether to temporarily suspend minimum renewable fuel content requirements as authorized under RCW 19.112.160.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 237; 2006 c 338 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Findings—Intent—2006 c 338: See note following RCW 19.112.110.

Effective date—2006 c 338: See RCW 19.112.903.